New Jersey, session 222, A2161.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    In addition to the amounts appropriated under P.L.2025, c.74, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, there is appropriated from the General Fund the following amount for the purpose specified: 54 DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES 20 Physical and Mental Health 23 Behavioral Health Services 7700 Division of Mental Health and Addiction Services GRANTS-IN-AID 08-7700  Community Services .............................................. $615,000 Total Grants-In-Aid appropriation, Division of Mental Health and Addiction Services $615,000 Grants-in-Aid: 08   NJ 2-1-1 Partnership Operating Aid....... ($615,000) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.